District of Columbia statutes.
11-1568.03

Period for exercise of right to revoke or elect.

The right to revoke an election under subsection (d) or to make an election under subsection (e) is irrevocably waived if not exercised within 180 days after the date of the enactment of this Act.

History

June 6, 1986, 100 Stat. 514, Pub. L. 99-335, § 601(e)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1568.3.

References in Text

The reference to “subsection (d)” should be to subsection (c) of § 601 of Pub. L. 99-335 which is codified at § 11-1568.01.

The reference to “subsection (e)” should be to subsection (d) of § 601 of Pub. L. 99-335 which is codified at § 11-1568.02.

“The date of the enactment of this Act” is June 6, 1986.

Editor's Notes

Section 23(d) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 11-1568.3 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 11-1568.03.